Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 1. Emergency Telephone Service

§ 16-9-101.
Short title.

This act is known and may be cited as the “Emergency Telephone Service Act”.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 150, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-9-102(a)(x).

§ 16-9-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Governing body” means the board of county commissioners of a county, city council or other governing body of a city, town or county, the board of directors of a special district or a joint powers board established pursuant to W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-110

;

“Local exchange access company” means a franchised telephone company engaged in providing telecommunications services between points within a local calling area;

“Local exchange access line” means any land line telephone line that connects a telephone subscriber to the local switching office and has the capability of reaching local public safety service agencies by voice communication;

“911 emergency reporting system” or “911 system” means a telephone system consisting of network, database, services and equipment, including operating and personnel costs as specified in W.S.

16-9-105

, using the single three-digit number 911 for reporting police, fire, medical or other emergency situations and enabling the users of a public telephone system, other technology or wireless telecommunications system to reach a public safety answering point to report emergencies by dialing 911. 911 emergency reporting systems may include systems consisting of network, database, services and equipment, including operating and personnel costs as specified in W.S.

16-9-105

, using 911 databases and public safety answering points to disseminate warnings to the public of impending hazards, including storms, floods, hazardous materials incidents or other emergencies that could compromise the public safety. For any 911 emergency reporting system that operates a reverse 911 warning system, a quarterly test on the warning system will be conducted by calling random numbers. The level of technology for provision of the 911 emergency reporting system is to be determined by the governing body and may include enhanced wireless 911 services, however, the 911 system shall include a device for telecommunications for the deaf;

“911 emergency tax” is the state-wide tax authorized by W.S.

16-9-109

and a tax on service users within the governing body’s designated 911 service area set by the governing body in accordance with this act and assessed on each service user’s local exchange access lines and wireless communications access to pay the directly related costs of a 911 system as authorized in accordance with W.S. 16-9-105;

“Public agency” means any city, town, county, special district, a joint powers board established pursuant to W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-110

or other political subdivision of the state located in whole or in part within this state providing or having the authority to provide fire fighting, law enforcement, ambulance, emergency medical or other emergency services;

“Public safety answering point” means a twenty-four (24) hour local jurisdiction communications facility receiving 911 service calls and directly dispatching emergency response services or relaying calls to the appropriate public or private safety agency or disseminating warnings to the public of impending hazards, including storms, floods, hazardous materials incidents or other emergencies that could compromise the public safety;

“Service supplier” means any utility, person or entity providing or offering to provide 911 system equipment, database installation, maintenance or local exchange access, wireless communication access or other technological device that under normal operation is designed or routinely used to access 911 services within the 911 service access area, including, for purposes of W.S.

16-9-108

and

16-9-109

, a seller of prepaid wireless communications access;

“Service user” means any person within the local government’s designated 911 service area who is provided local exchange access telephone service, wireless communication access service or other technological device that under normal operation is designed or routinely used to access 911;

“This act” means W.S.

16-9-101

through

16-9-111

;

“Enhanced wireless 911 service” means any enhanced 911 service so designated by the Federal Communications Commission, including wireless automatic location identification and automatic number identification;

“Wireless automatic location identification” means the definition supplied by the Federal Communication Commission regulation that provides for the automatic display on equipment at the public safety answering point of the location of the wireless service user initiating a 911 call to the public safety answering point;

“Wireless automatic number identification” means the definition supplied by the Federal Communication Commission regulation that allows the mobile identification number of the wireless service user initiating a 911 call to the public safety answering point;

“Wireless carrier” means a provider of commercial mobile services or any other radio communication service that the Federal Communications Commission requires to provide wireless 911 service;

“Wireless communications access” means the radio equipment and assigned mobile identification number used to connect a wireless customer to a wireless carrier for two-way interactive voice or voice capable services;

“Wireless 911 service” means any 911 service provided by a wireless carrier, including enhanced wireless 911 service;

“Prepaid wireless communications access” means wireless communications access which requires advance payment that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount.

“Law enforcement agency” means as defined in W.S. 7-3-902(a)(i).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 150, § 1; 1990, ch. 73, § 2; 2003, ch. 121, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2008, ch. 66, § 1; 2012, ch. 67, § 1; 2015 ch. 90, § 2, effective March 2, 2015; 2019 ch. 178, § 2, effective March 8, 2019; 2020 ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(x), substituted “16-9-108” for “16-9-106.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added the second, third and last sentence in (a)(iv); and added all that part following “private safety agency” in (a)(vii).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(i), added “or a joint powers board established pursuant to W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-110

” and made a related change; and in (a)(vi), inserted “a joint powers board established pursuant to W.S.

16-4-101

through

16-4-110

.”

The 2015 amendment,

in (a)(iv), deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Effective January 1, 2009, the governing body shall file with the Wyoming public service commission a certified statement of its annual gross receipts and detailed and itemized annual expenditures of any taxes collected pursuant to this act from 2004 through and including the most recent calendar year”; in (a)(v), inserted “the state-wide tax authorized by W.S.

16-9-109

and”; at the end of (a)(viii), added “including, for purposes of W.S.

16-9-108

and

16-9-109

, a seller of prepaid wireless communications access”;
in (a)(x), substituted “16-9-109” for “16-9-108”; added (a)(xvii); and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 90, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

in (a)(x), substituted “W.S.

16-9-101

through

16-9-110

” for “W.S.

16-9-101

through

16-9-109

.”

Laws 2019, ch. 178 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(x) substituted “through

16-9-111

” for “through

16-9-110

”; and added (a)(xviii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 16-9-103.
Imposition of tax; liability of user for tax; collection; uncollected amounts; discontinuing service prohibited.

In addition to any other powers for the protection of the public health, a governing body may incur any nonrecurring or recurring costs for the installation, maintenance or operation of a 911 system and may pay these costs by imposing a 911 emergency tax for this service in those portions of the governing body’s jurisdiction for which 911 service is to be provided.

In accordance with the provisions of this subsection, and after a public hearing the governing body may, by ordinance in the case of cities and by resolution in the case of counties or special districts, impose a monthly uniform tax on service users within its designated 911 service area in an amount not to exceed seventy-five cents ($.75) per month on each local exchange access line, per wireless communications access or other technological device that under normal operation is designed or routinely used to access 911. Only one (1) governing body may impose a 911 emergency tax for each 911 system. Except as provided by W.S.

16-9-109

for prepaid wireless communication access and regardless of the level at which the tax is set, if an assessment is made on both local exchange access facilities and wireless communications access, the amount of the tax imposed per local exchange access facility and the amount of the tax imposed per wireless communications access or access by other technological device that under normal operation is designed or routinely used to access 911, shall be equal. Except as provided by W.S.

16-9-109

, the proceeds of the 911 emergency tax shall be set aside in an enterprise fund or other separate accounts from which the receipts shall be used to pay for the 911 system costs authorized in W.S.

16-9-105

, and may be imposed at any time following the execution of an agreement with the provider of the service at the discretion of the governing body.

No 911 emergency tax shall be imposed upon more than one hundred (100) local exchange access lines or their equivalent per customer billing.

Collection of any 911 emergency tax from a service user pursuant to this act shall commence at the time specified by the governing body in accordance with this act. Taxes imposed under this act and required to be collected by the service supplier shall be added to and stated separately in the billings to the service user.

Every billed service user shall be liable for any 911 emergency tax imposed under this act until it has been paid to the service supplier or governing body.

An action to collect taxes under subsection (d) of this section may be brought by or on behalf of the public agency imposing the tax. The service supplier shall annually provide the governing body a list of the amounts uncollected along with the names and addresses of delinquent service users. The service supplier is not liable for uncollected amounts.

Any 911 emergency tax imposed under this act shall be collected at the time charges for the telecommunications are collected under the regular billing practice of the service supplier.

Service shall not be discontinued to any service user by any service supplier for the nonpayment of any tax under this act.

The 911 emergency tax imposed pursuant to this section shall only be imposed upon service users whose address is in those portions of the governing body’s jurisdiction for which emergency telephone service shall be provided; however, such 911 emergency tax shall not be imposed upon any state or local governmental entity.

Effective January 1, 2015, and every fiscal year through June 30, 2019, the governing body primarily responsible for the expenditure of revenues collected pursuant to this act shall file with the Wyoming public service commission a statement of its gross receipts and expenditures authorized by this act for the prior fiscal year. The Wyoming public service commission is authorized to promulgate rules in consultation with the governing bodies to develop a statement of revenues and expenditures that, to the maximum extent possible, is uniform across governing bodies.

Except as provided in subsection (k) of this section, this section shall not apply to the 911 emergency tax imposed on prepaid wireless communication access by W.S.

16-9-109

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 150, § 1; 2003, ch. 121, § 2; 2015 ch. 90, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “this act” for “this chapter” in (d), (e), and (j); in (b), added “Except as provided by W.S.

16-9-109

for prepaid wireless communication access and” at the beginning of the third sentence, and added “Except as provided by W.S.

16-9-109

” at the beginning of the last sentence; added (k) and (m); and made a related change.

Laws 2015, ch. 90, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-9-102(a)(x).

§ 16-9-104.
Remittance of tax to the governing body; administrative fee; establishment of rate of tax.

Except as provided in W.S.

16-9-109

, any tax imposed under this act and the amounts collected are to be remitted quarterly to the governing body. The amount of the tax collected in one (1) calendar quarter by the service supplier shall be remitted to the governing body no later than fifteen (15) days after the close of the calendar quarter. On or before the sixteenth day of each month following the preceding calendar quarter, a return for the preceding quarter shall be filed with the governing body in a form the governing body and service supplier agree upon. The service supplier required to file the return shall deliver the return together with the remittance of the amount of the tax payable to the governing body. The service supplier shall maintain a record of the amount of each tax collected pursuant to this act. The record shall be maintained for a period of one (1) year after the time the tax was collected.

Except as provided by W.S.

16-9-109

, the service supplier remitting the taxes collected under this act may deduct and retain one percent (1%) of the taxes collected as the cost of administration for collecting the taxes.

At least once each calendar year, the governing body shall establish a rate of tax not to exceed the amount authorized. Amounts collected in excess of necessary expenditures within any fiscal year shall be carried forward to subsequent years and shall only be used for the purposes set forth in W.S.

16-9-105

. The governing body shall fix the rate, publish notice of its new rate and notify by mail every local exchange access company at least ninety (90) days before the new rate becomes effective. The governing body may at its own expense require an annual audit of the service supplier’s books and records concerning the collection and remittance of the taxes authorized by this act.

This section does not apply to the taxes authorized and collected for prepaid wireless communication access under W.S.

16-9-109

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 150, § 1; 2003, ch. 121, § 2; 2015 ch. 90, § 2, effective March 2, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (a) and (b), added the exception at the beginning; substituted “this act” for “this chapter” in (a) through (c); in the first sentence in (a), added “to the governing body” at the end; added (d); and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 90, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

§ 16-9-105.
Agreements or contract for 911 emergency reporting systems; use of funds collected.

Any governing body imposing the tax authorized by this act may enter into an agreement directly with any service supplier to the 911 system or may contract and cooperate with any public agency or any other state for the administration of a 911 system in accordance with law.

Funds collected from the 911 emergency tax imposed pursuant to this act shall be spent solely to pay for public safety answering point and service suppliers’ equipment and service costs, installation costs, maintenance costs, monthly recurring charges and other costs directly related to the continued operation of a 911 system including enhanced wireless 911 service and next generation 911 emergency communications systems. Funds may also be expended for personnel expenses necessarily incurred by a public safety answering point. “Personnel expenses necessarily incurred” means expenses incurred for persons employed to:

Take emergency telephone calls and dispatch them appropriately;

Maintain the computer database of the public safety answering point; or

Integrate legacy communications infrastructure for 911 systems into interoperable next generation 911 emergency communications systems.

Funds collected from the charge pursuant to this act shall be credited to a cash account separate from the general fund of the public agency, for payments for public safety answering points and service supplier costs pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. Any monies remaining in the cash account at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the account for payments during any succeeding year. If any 911 system is discontinued, monies remaining in the account shall, after all payments to the service supplier pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, be transferred to the general fund of the public agency or proportionately to the general fund of each participating public agency.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 150, § 1; 2003, ch. 121, § 2; ch. 202, § 4; 2015 ch. 90, § 2, effective March 2, 2015; 2022 ch. 94, § 1, effective March 16, 2022.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted
“this act” for “this chapter” in (a), the introductory language of (b), and (c).

Laws 2015, ch. 90, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2015.

The 2022 amendment

added “and next generation 911 emergency communications systems” at the end of the first sentence of the introductory language of (b); deleted “or” at the end of (b)(i); in (b)(ii), substituted “database” for “data base,” added “or” at the end; added (b)(iii); and made a related change.

Laws 2022, ch. 94, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 16, 2022.

§ 16-9-106.
Private listing and wireless subscribers, 911 service.

Private listing and wireless subscribers in 911 service areas waive privacy afforded by nonlisted or nonpublished numbers to the extent that the name and address associated with the telephone number may be furnished to the 911 system, for call routing, for automatic retrieval of location information and for associated emergency services.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 150, § 1; 2003, ch. 121, § 2.

§ 16-9-107.
Confidentiality of information.

The information obtained through a 911 system shall be considered a public record under W.S. 16-4-201(a)(v) and access to the information may be denied according to law.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 73, § 1.

§ 16-9-108.
Immunity for providers.

No basic emergency service provider or service supplier and no employee or agent thereof shall be liable to any person or entity for infringement or invasion of the right of privacy of any person caused or claimed to have been caused, directly or indirectly, by any act or omission in connection with the installation, operation, maintenance, removal, presence, condition, occasion or use of emergency service features, automatic number identification, automatic location identification services or provision in an emergency of call location information and the equipment associated therewith, including the identification of the telephone number, address or name associated with the telephone used by the person accessing 911 service, wireless automatic number identification, wireless automatic location identification service or text to 911 service. A governmental entity, public safety agency, local exchange access company, telephone exchange access company or wireless carrier that provides access to an emergency system or any officers, agents or employees thereof is not liable as a result of any act or omission except willful and wanton misconduct or gross negligence in connection with developing, adopting, operating or implementing emergency telephone service, enhanced wireless 911 service, text to 911 service or any 911 system. No public service answering point, wireless carrier, service supplier or any other person shall be civilly or criminally liable for providing call location information pursuant to W.S.

16-9-111

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 121, § 1; 2015 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2020 ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “or text to 911 service” or similar language twice, and made related changes.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added “or provision in an emergency of call location information” preceding “and the equipment associated,” added the last sentence, and made a related change.

§ 16-9-109.
State-wide imposition of tax; prepaid wireless; collection; distribution; immunity.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, on and after July 1, 2016, there is imposed a 911 emergency tax of one and five-tenths percent (1.5%) on every retail sale of prepaid wireless communications access in Wyoming. The tax shall not be imposed on sales of prepaid wireless communications access intended for resale or upon any state or local governmental entity.

A service supplier who sells prepaid wireless communications access shall collect the tax imposed by subsection (a) of this section from each purchaser of prepaid wireless communications access, which purchaser shall be considered a service user. The amount of the tax shall be either separately stated on an invoice, receipt or other similar document that is provided to the service user by the service supplier or shall be otherwise disclosed to the service user.

For purposes of this section, a retail sale of prepaid wireless communications access occurs in Wyoming if the transaction would be sourced to Wyoming under W.S. 39-15-104(f)(xi)(C).

The tax imposed by subsection (a) of this section is the liability of the service user and the service supplier. The service supplier shall be liable to remit all taxes due or collected as provided in subsection (g) of this section.

If the tax collected pursuant to this section is separately stated on an invoice, receipt or similar document provided to the service user by the service supplier, the tax shall not be included in the base for calculating any other tax, fee, surcharge or other charge imposed by this state, any political subdivision of the state or any intergovernmental agency.

When prepaid wireless communication access is sold with one (1) or more other products or services for a single, nonitemized price, the tax authorized by subsection (a) of this section shall not be applied to a retail sale of prepaid wireless communications access of ten (10) or fewer minutes or which has a value of five dollars ($5.00) or less.

All taxes collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be remitted by the service supplier who collected them to the department of revenue as follows:

A service supplier shall remit to the department of revenue all monies collected at the times and in the manner provided by W.S. 39-15-107(a). The department of revenue may establish by rule procedures reasonably necessary to facilitate the transfer of these monies. The service supplier shall be subject to the penalty and enforcement provisions provided by W.S.

39-15-108

for any failure to collect or remit funds;

A service supplier remitting collected taxes may deduct and retain three percent (3%) of the taxes collected as the cost of administration for collecting the taxes;

The audit and appeal procedures applicable to the collection of state sales taxes shall apply to the collection and remittance of taxes authorized by this section;

Pursuant to rules adopted for this purpose, the department of revenue shall establish a procedure by which service suppliers shall document that a transaction is not a retail sale subject to the tax imposed by this section. The procedure shall be substantially similar to the procedure used to document a sale for resale transaction for purposes of sales tax.

The monies collected by the department of revenue under this section shall not be general revenues of the state and shall be held by the department in a separate account for distribution as follows:

The department shall deduct one percent (1%) of the total monies collected to cover its administrative expenses and costs, which amount shall be remitted to the treasurer for credit to the general fund;

After deduction of the amount authorized by paragraph (i) of this subsection, the department shall pay all remaining amounts collected to each county that imposes and collects the 911 emergency tax authorized by W.S.

16-9-103

;

The payment authorized by paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall be remitted to the county no later than fifteen (15) days after the close of the calendar quarter and is subject to the requirements of paragraph (iv) of this subsection;

Each county receiving payment pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection shall receive three percent (3%) of the total amount distributed pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection. Each county shall receive the remaining balance of the amount distributed under paragraph (ii) of this subsection in proportion to the percentage that the county’s total population relates to the state’s total population;

If a governing body other than a county imposes a 911 emergency tax pursuant to W.S.

16-9-103

, the county in which that governing body is located shall divide all monies received by the county pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection equally between the county and the governing body;

All funds received by any governing body pursuant to this subsection shall be expended only for the purposes authorized by W.S.

16-9-105

;

Amounts collected by any governing body pursuant to this subsection in excess of necessary expenditures within any fiscal year shall be carried forward to subsequent years and shall be used only for the purposes authorized by W.S.

16-9-105

;

The department of revenue may promulgate rules necessary to implement this subsection.

The department of revenue and the Wyoming public service commission shall jointly report to the joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions committee on or before July 1, 2019 and every four (4) years thereafter. The report required by this subsection shall contain an analysis of the tax rate imposed by subsection (a) of this section and shall determine whether that tax rate places a tax burden on purchasers of prepaid wireless communication access which is substantially equivalent to the tax burden imposed by W.S. 16-9-103(b). If the tax burden imposed by this section is not substantially equivalent to the tax burden imposed by W.S. 16-9-103(b), the department and the commission shall advise the committee on the tax rate that would make the burden imposed by the two (2) taxes equivalent. The department of revenue and the Wyoming public service commission may adopt rules requiring the reporting of sales data or other information necessary to complete the analysis required by this subsection.

History.

2015 ch. 90, § 1, effective March 2, 2015.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2015, ch. 90, § 1, makes the act effective March 2, 2015.

§ 16-9-110.
Statewide 911 coordinator.

The governor shall designate an individual within the department of transportation as the statewide 911 coordinator, who shall be a qualified elector of the state and whose duties may be removed by the governor. The coordinator shall be responsible for coordinating with 911 local and state stakeholders to develop a statewide 911 plan and ensuring compliance with federal grant regulations.

History.

2019 ch. 178, § 1, effective March 8, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 178, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

§ 16-9-111.
Providing call location information in an emergency.

At the request of a law enforcement agency officer or an employee or other agent of a public safety answering point on behalf of a law enforcement agency, who is acting in the course of the official duties of the officer or agent, a wireless carrier or service supplier shall provide, subject to any limitations under applicable federal law, available call location information of a telecommunications device without delay if the officer or agent asserts:

That the device was used to place a 911 call requesting emergency assistance; or

Reasonable suspicion that the device is in the possession of an individual who is involved in an emergency situation that involves the risk of death or serious physical harm.

If a law enforcement agency officer, or an employee or other agent of a public safety answering point acting on behalf of such an officer, submits a request for location information to a wireless carrier or service supplier under subsection (a) of this section, the law enforcement agency employing the officer shall maintain a record of the request that includes each of the following:

The name of the officer or agent making the request or, in the case of a request made by an agent, the name of the officer on whose behalf the agent is acting;

A description of the request that explains the need for disclosure of location information;

A declaration that disclosure of location information is needed based on the conditions described in paragraph (a)(i) or (ii) of this section.

A wireless carrier or service supplier may establish protocols by which the carrier or supplier voluntarily discloses call location information.

The statewide 911 coordinator shall obtain direct contact information from all wireless carriers and service suppliers authorized to do business in this state to facilitate a request from a law enforcement agency or a public safety answering point on behalf of a law enforcement agency for call location information under this section. All wireless carriers and service suppliers shall inform the statewide 911 coordinator of any changes to their direct contact information. The statewide 911 coordinator shall disseminate the direct contact information to each public safety answering point in this state.

History.

2020 ch. 98, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.